Maine, session 132, LD1807.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§17-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §19
and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §19 and affected by §28, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
17-B. Taxable service. "Taxable service" means the:
A. Rental of living quarters in a hotel, rooming house or tourist or trailer camp;
B. Transmission and distribution of electricity;
C. Sale of an extended service contract on an automobile or truck that entitles the
purchaser to specific benefits in the service of the automobile or truck for a specific
duration;
D. Sale of prepaid calling service;
E. Charter of a private aircraft or helicopter;
F. Rental of a limousine or luxury car; and
G. Charter of watercraft in excess of 25 feet.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§92, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 209, §3 and affected
by §5, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §23
and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §22 and affected by §28, is further amended
to read:
D. For sales occurring on or after October 1, 2019 and before January 1, 2026, the rate
of tax is 5.5% on the value of all tangible personal property and taxable services, except
the rate of tax is:
(1) Eight percent on the value of prepared food;
(2) Eight percent on the value of liquor sold in licensed establishments as defined
in Title 28‑A, section 2, subsection 15, in accordance with Title 28‑A, chapter 43
and liquor sold for on-premises consumption by a licensed brewery, small brewery,
winery, small winery, distillery or small distillery pursuant to Title 28‑A, section
1355‑A, subsection 2, paragraph B;
(3) Nine percent on the value of rental of living quarters in any hotel, rooming
house or tourist or trailer camp;
(4) Ten percent on the value of rental for a period of less than one year of:
(a) An automobile; or
(c) A loaner vehicle that is provided other than to a motor vehicle dealer's
service customers pursuant to a manufacturer's or dealer's warranty; and
(5) Ten percent on the value of adult use cannabis, adult use cannabis products
and, if sold by a person to an individual who is not a qualifying patient, cannabis
Page 1 - 132LR2284(01)

410 and cannabis products beginning on the first day of the calendar month in which
421 adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products may be sold in the State by a
432 cannabis establishment licensed to conduct retail sales pursuant to Title 28‑B,
443 chapter 1.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. For sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026, the rate of tax is 5.5% on the value
of all tangible personal property and taxable services, except the rate of tax is:
(1) Eight percent on the value of prepared food;
(2) Eight percent on the value of liquor sold in licensed establishments as defined
in Title 28‑A, section 2, subsection 15, in accordance with Title 28‑A, chapter 43
and liquor sold for on-premises consumption by a licensed brewery, small brewery,
winery, small winery, distillery or small distillery pursuant to Title 28‑A, section
1355‑A, subsection 2, paragraph B;
(3) Nine percent on the value of rental of living quarters in any hotel, rooming
house or tourist or trailer camp;
(4) Fifteen percent on the value of an automobile rental for a period of less than
one year; and
(5) Ten percent on the value of adult use cannabis, adult use cannabis products and,
if sold by a person to an individual who is not a qualifying patient, cannabis and
cannabis products by a cannabis establishment licensed to conduct retail sales
pursuant to Title 28‑B, chapter 1.
Sec. 5. Application. This Act applies to sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026.